Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 50
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY FOR DISPLACED HOMEMAKER ACT

Sec.

§ 39-5001. Policy.

The policy of the state of Idaho is hereby declared to be a recognition of the increasing number of persons in the state who, having fulfilled the valuable role of homemaker, find themselves displaced because of death or disability of spouse, or divorce or other loss of family income. As a consequence, displaced homemakers have an insufficient income; high rate of unemployment due to age, lack of paid work experience and discrimination; and limited opportunities to collect funds of assistance from social security, unemployment compensation, medicaid or other health insurance benefits, or pension plans of the spouse. This chapter seeks to coordinate efforts by state and local public agencies in cooperation with private agencies and organizations to assist displaced homemakers to continue as productive citizens, even though their role has necessarily changed.

§ 39-5002. Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Displaced homemaker” means a person who:

Has worked in the home providing household services for family members, but who has lost the primary source of economic support and who must gain employment skills in order to earn a living; or

Is a single parent with primary financial and custodial responsibility for supporting dependent children and who must gain employment skills in order to earn a living.

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division of career technical education.

§ 39-5003. Service centers.

The administrator is authorized to establish multipurpose service centers for displaced homemakers. Each center shall have an advisory board appointed by the administrator in consultation with the director of the center. Such board shall consist of individuals representing displaced homemakers, organizations and agencies providing services beneficial to displaced homemakers, and the general public.

Each center shall include the following services:

Job counseling services designed for a displaced homemaker;

Job training and placement services developed in cooperation with public and private employers to train displaced homemakers for available jobs in the public and private sectors, taking into account the skills and job experiences of a homemaker and to assist displaced homemakers in gaining admission to existing public and private job training programs;

Health education and counseling services with respect to general principles of preventative health care, mental health, alcohol and drug addiction and other related health care matters;

Financial management services which provide information and assistance with respect to insurance, taxes, estate and probate problems, mortgages, loans and other related financial matters; and

Educational services including information about courses offering credit through secondary and postsecondary education programs and information about other services determined to be of interest and benefit to displaced homemakers.

§ 39-5004. Site selection.

In selecting sites for the centers established under this chapter, the administrator shall consider:

The needs of each region of the state for a center;

The needs of both urban and rural communities; and

The availability of existing facilities adaptable for use as a center.

The administrator may select a public or nonprofit private organization to administer the centers.

The administrator is authorized to enter into contracts with and make grants to the organizations selected for the purpose of establishing and administering centers under this chapter.

The administrator shall cooperate with other state, local and federal agencies to coordinate, through the service centers, all programs applicable to displaced homemakers and to avoid duplication of services.

To the greatest extent possible, the staff of the service centers established under this chapter, including supervisory, technical and administrative positions, shall be filled by displaced homemakers. Where necessary, potential staff members shall be provided with on-the-job training.

§ 39-5005. Eligibility and fees.

The administrator with the advice of the staff at the centers, shall promulgate rules concerning the eligibility of persons to receive assistance through the multipurpose service centers. A sliding fee may be charged for services at the discretion of the director of the center.

§ 39-5006. Grants and gifts.

The director of the center may, with approval of the administrator, apply for and accept any funds, grants, gifts or services made available by any agency or department of the federal government or any private agency or individual, which funds shall be used to carry out the total program of the centers.

§ 39-5007. Reports of each center.

The director of each center shall report to the administrator or his/her designee, and shall evaluate the effectiveness of the job training, placement and service to displaced homemakers, including the number of persons trained, the number of persons placed in employment, follow-up data on such persons, the number of persons served by the various service programs, and cost effectiveness of the various components of the center. The administrator shall report annually to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate of the legislature on the status of the displaced homemaker program. The report shall be filed not later than the fifteenth legislative day and in addition to compilations of the information received from each center, may include recommendations of the administrator relating to the program.

§ 39-5008. Discrimination prohibited.

No person shall, on the ground of sex, age, race, color, religion, national origin or disability, be excluded from participating in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination under any program or activity made available under this chapter.

§ 39-5009. Displaced homemaker account — Fees on filing of divorce action.

There is hereby created in the state operating fund the displaced homemaker account. All fees collected pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be deposited in the account. All moneys in the account shall be available for appropriation to the state board for career technical education for the purposes of this chapter.

In addition to any other fees imposed for filing an action for divorce in the district court, there shall be collected a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for each divorce action. The clerk of the district court shall remit such fees, separately identified, to the state treasurer for deposit in the displaced homemaker account. Fees shall be remitted to the state treasurer at the same time as other court fees are remitted.